Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202118-1705
Road or street improvement; avoidance of menace to travel; additional land; acquisition by purchase, gift, or eminent domain.

Whenever any city or village shall need any additional land for the purpose of avoiding a menace to travel by caving, sliding, washing, or otherwise or for the purpose of improving, maintaining, or changing any road, street, alley, or other public highway, such city or village may acquire such needed land or an easement therein by purchase, gift, or eminent domain proceedings. Such land may be so acquired regardless of whether the land is contiguous or noncontiguous to such road, street, alley, or highway, or within or without the corporate limits of such city or village. In case of eminent domain proceedings, the procedure to condemn property shall be exercised in the manner set forth in sections 76-704 to 76-724.

Laws 1957, c. 43, § 1, p. 219;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 92.
August 28, 2021